Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.035

Membership in system—Charter school employers and employees.

This section designates charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW as employers and charter school employees as members, and applies only if the department of retirement systems receives determinations from the internal revenue service and the United States department of labor that participation does not jeopardize the status of these retirement systems as governmental plans under the federal employees' retirement income security act and the internal revenue code.

[ 2016 c 241 s 134. Prior: 2013 c 2 s 304 (Initiative Measure No. 1240, approved November 6, 2012).]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 241: See RCW 28A.710.901.